Washington statutes.
RCW 35.59.080

Lease or contract for use or operation of facilities.

The legislative body of any municipality owning or operating a multi-purpose community center acquired or developed pursuant to this chapter shall have power to lease to any municipality, governmental agency or person, or to contract for the use or operation by any municipality, governmental agency or person, of all or any part of the multi-purpose community center facilities authorized by this chapter, for such period and under such terms and conditions and upon such rentals, fees and charges as such legislative body may determine, and may pledge all or any portion of such rentals, fees and charges and any other revenue derived from the ownership and/or operation of any facilities of a multi-purpose community center to pay and to secure the payment of general obligation bonds and/or revenue bonds of such municipality issued for multi-purpose community center purposes.

[ 1967 c 110 s 8.]